Missouri, session 2026, SB1129.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 571.121 and 571.230, RSMo, are
repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as sections 571.121 and 571.230, to read as follows:
571.121. 1. Any person issued a concealed carry
permit pursuant to sections 571.101 to 571.121, or a
concealed carry endorsement issued prior to August 28, 2013,
shall carry the concealed carry permit or endorsement at all
times the person is carrying a concealed firearm and shall
display the concealed carry permit and a state or federal
government-issued photo identification or the endorsement or
permit upon the request of any peace officer. Carrying and
display of a concealed carry permit or endorsement as
required under this subsection may be accomplished by the
carrying and display of a digital copy of such concealed
carry permit or endorsement, which includes but is not
limited to a personal photograph of the permit or
endorsement stored digitally on an electronic device.
Failure to comply with this subsection shall not be a
criminal offense but the concealed carry permit or

SB 1129 2
endorsement holder may be issued a citation for an amount
not to exceed thirty-five dollars.
2. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the
director of revenue, by carrying out his or her requirement
to issue a driver's or nondriver's license reflecting that a
concealed carry permit has been granted under the law as it
existed prior to August 28, 2013, shall bear no liability
and shall be immune from any claims for damages resulting
from any determination made regarding the qualification of
any person for such permit or for any actions stemming from
the conduct of any person issued such a permit. By issuing
the permit on the driver's or nondriver's license, the
director of revenue was merely acting as a scrivener for any
determination made by the sheriff that the person was
qualified for the permit.
571.230. Any person issued a Missouri lifetime or
extended concealed carry permit under sections 571.205 to
571.230, shall carry the permit at all times the person is
carrying a concealed firearm and shall display the permit
and a state or federal government-issued photo
identification upon the request of any peace officer.
Carrying and display of a permit as required under this
subsection may be accomplished by the carrying and display
of a digital copy of such permit, which includes but is not
limited to a personal photograph of the permit stored
digitally on an electronic device. Failure to comply with
this section shall not be a criminal offense but the
Missouri lifetime or extended concealed carry permit holder
may be issued a citation for an amount not to exceed thirty-
five dollars.
✓